Washington statutes.
RCW 11.135.080

Notarization.

If other law of this state requires a signature or record to be notarized, acknowledged, verified, or made under oath, the requirement is satisfied with respect to an electronic nontestamentary estate planning document if an individual authorized to perform the notarization, acknowledgment, verification, or oath attaches or logically associates the individual's electronic signature on the document together with all other information required to be included under the other law. The individual making the statement or executing the signature may appear physically or, as provided in RCW 42.45.280, remotely.

[ 2024 c 188 s 9.]